Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF148.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 483A.24, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: b. Upon written application on forms furnished by the department, the department shall issue annually without fee one wild turkey license to the owner of a farm unit or to a member of the ownerâs family, but not to both, and to the tenant or to a member of the tenantâs family, but not to both. The wild turkey hunting licenses issued shall be valid only on the farm unit for which an applicant qualifies pursuant to this subsection and shall be equivalent to the least restrictive license issued under section 481A.38 . The owner or the tenant need not reside on the farm unit to qualify for a free license to hunt on that farm unit. The free turkey hunting licenses issued pursuant to this paragraph shall be valid and may be used during any bow or firearm open turkey hunting season using a method of take authorized for that season, subject to any other restrictions that may apply, without first designating a Senate File 148, p. 2 season of use for the license . Each license issued under this paragraph authorizes the person issued the license to harvest one wild turkey. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 148, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor